Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1409
State of Nebraska; power to lease or sublease.

The State of Nebraska is hereby empowered to enter into a lease or sublease, as lessor or sublessor, with any public body corporate or any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska relating to any building or other facility which is or has been the subject of an agreement pursuant to the provisions of section 72-1405.

Laws 1974, LB 945, § 1.